Idaho, session 2025, H0141.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT. The Legislature finds that
direct accountability is necessary and appropriate to ensure that institu-
tions of higher education in the state of Idaho effectively implement the
provisions of Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. 1681
et seq.). Accordingly, it is the intent of the Legislature to assign sole re-
sponsibility for Title IX compliance to the president of each public insti-
tution of higher education in the state of Idaho to ensure that Title IX re-
sponsibilities are implemented, overseen, and enforced at the highest level
of leadership within each institution.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 37, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-3732, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-3732. TITLE IX COMPLIANCE IN HIGHER EDUCATION. (1) For the purposes
of this section:
(a) "Institution of higher education" means any public postsecondary
institution, including but not limited to universities, colleges, and
community colleges, operating within the state of Idaho that receives
federal financial assistance.
(b) "Office for civil rights" means the federal agency responsible for
enforcing title IX compliance within educational institutions.
(c) "President" means the chief executive officer or equivalent high-
est-ranking official of an institution of higher education in the state
of Idaho, without regard to the specific title of such individual.
(d) "Title IX" means title IX of the education amendments of 1972 (20
U.S.C. 1681 et seq.), and all applicable federal regulations duly pro-
mulgated by any federal department or agency pursuant to the same.
(e) "Title IX compliance" means the policies, procedures, actions, and
investigations required by title IX to ensure that an institution of
higher education is in compliance with title IX.
(2) The president of each institution of higher education in Idaho
shall have the exclusive authority and duty to implement all title IX compli-
ance. When necessary, the president of an institution of higher education
may delegate specific tasks or duties related to title IX to designated
staff reporting to the office of the president, provided that the president


approves any final decision or action on any title IX related task or duty.
To carry out this provision, the president of each institution of higher
education in Idaho shall:
(a) Establish policies to implement the requirements of title IX and
corresponding binding federal regulations issued by the United States
department of education and the office for civil rights. Such policies
shall be narrowly tailored to meet only the minimum requirements of ti-
tle IX; and
(b) Ensure that all complaints filed with the institution of higher
education pursuant to title IX are promptly investigated in accordance
with title IX regulations. The president shall review and approve any
decisions regarding sanctions, accommodations, or disciplinary ac-
tions arising from title IX complaints.
(3) The president of each institution of higher education shall pre-
pare and submit a report to the Idaho state board of education and the Idaho
legislative services office no later than July 1 of each year, which report
shall include:
(a) The number of title IX complaints received during the previous aca-
demic year. The report shall also include the number of investigations
conducted and a description of the outcomes of all investigations;
(b) Copies of all title IX-related policies and procedures of the in-
stitution of higher education, which shall conspicuously highlight any
changes made to such policies and procedures during the previous year;
(c) A summary of interim measures taken to protect complainants and the
accused during the time an investigation is pending; and
(d) A summary of all corrective actions taken to address failures in ti-
tle IX compliance.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.